Massachusetts, session 194th, S2049.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 64A of the General Laws, as most recently amended by chapter 46 of the acts of
2013, is hereby further amended by inserting, after section 7A, the following section:-
Section 7B. The sale of fuel to a city or town which having consumed the same for any
municipal purpose shall be exempt from the excise established by this chapter.
of 1